test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTI_AM_CNJ_waabandam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTI+Cnj - AM - waabandam :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum prt     dub
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 313)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: waabndamaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: waabndaman 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0SgO: waabndang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+4+0SgO: waabndamnid 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0SgO: waabndaming 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl+0SgO: waabndamaang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamang 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: waabndameg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaad #even parity stem = awaad?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: waabndamaambaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: waabndammba #cons 
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamamba #book 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+0SgO: waabndangba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg+0SgO: waabndamngiba #book #this looks like 21pl, not 3sg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+4+0SgO: waabndamnipa
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0SgO: waabndamngiba
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl+0SgO: waabndamaangba
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamngiba 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamegba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamegiba #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaapa #odd parity stem = awaapa?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: waabndamwaane
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamwane 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndamgwenh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4+0SgO: waabndamnigwenh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0SgO: waabndamwiinge #striking difference from vai (wii, no nasV)
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaange
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamwange 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamwegwenh #odd to have nasV, but book had once for VTI too...
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaagwenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: waabndamwaambaane
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamwambne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: waabndamwambane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndamgobne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg+0SgO: waabndamgobane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+4+0SgO: waabndamnigbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+4+0SgO: waabndamnigobane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X+0SgO: waabndamwiingbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X+0SgO: waabndamwiingibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaangbane
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaangibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamwangbane #cons 
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+21Pl+0SgO: waabndamwangibane #book 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamwegbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: waabndamwegibane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaagbane #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Pl+0SgO: waabndamwaagobane #book
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO:        waabndanzwaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO:        waabndanzwan 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg+0SgO:        waabndanzig 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+4+0SgO:      waabndanznig 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0SgO:        waabndanzing #also zwing
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl+0SgO:     waabndanzwaang
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+21Pl+0SgO:   waabndanzwang 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO:     waabndanzweg
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl+0SgO:     waabndanzgwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3 #sii forms extrapolated conservatively
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO:      waabndanzwaambaanh
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO:      waabndanzwamba    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg+0SgO:      waabndanzgoba #diverges from VTI
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+4+0SgO:    waabndanznigba #diverges from VTI    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0SgO:      waabndanzngiba    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl+0SgO:   waabndanzwaangba  
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+21Pl+0SgO: waabndanzwangba #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+21Pl+0SgO: waabndanzwngiba #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO:   waabndanzwegba #book indicates /ziwegoba/ ... egw rides again    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl+0SgO:   waabndanzgwaaba #diverges from VTI (/sigwaa/ need not end string)   
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO:          waabndanziiwaane    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO:          waabndanziiwne #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO:         waabndanziiwane #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg+0SgO:          waabndanziigwenh #book lacks nasV ... generally lacks nas info for neg (prt) dub
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+4+0SgO:        waabndanziingwenh #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0SgO:          waabndanziiwiingwenh #again, wii diff from VTI, nasV?
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl+0SgO:       waabndanziiwaange   
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+21Pl+0SgO:     waabndanziiwnge #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO:       waabndanziiwegwe    
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl+0SgO:       waabndanziiwaagwenh 
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4 
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Sg+0SgO:       waabndanziiwaambaane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg+0SgO:       waabndanziiwmbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Sg+0SgO:       waabndanziigbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+4+0SgO:     waabndanziingobne #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X+0SgO:       waabndanziingbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Pl+0SgO:    waabndanziiwaangbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+21Pl+0SgO:  waabndanziiwngobne #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Pl+0SgO:    waabndanziiwegbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     waabndaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Pl+0SgO:    waabndanziiwaagbane #italicized v's in book form, deleted per rhyth sync rule
     
